Vermont, session 2025-2026, H630.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. § 2433 is added to read:
§ 2433. CONNECTED DEVICES; MINIMUM SECURITY STANDARDS
(a) Requirements. A business shall not sell or deliver into this State any
consumer electronic product that is capable of connecting to the internet, or to
other electronic products that are capable of connecting to the internet, unless
the product meets the following minimum security standards:
(1) Encrypted communications. The product shall use encryption for its
network communication functions and capabilities to ensure that its
communications are not eavesdropped on or modified in transit.
VT LEG #386333 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.630
2026 Page 2 of 3
(2) Security updates.
(A) The product shall support automatic updates for a reasonable
period after sale, and shall be enabled by default, to ensure that when a
vulnerability is known, the business can make security updates available for
consumers that are verified using a form of cryptography and installed
seamlessly.
(B) An update shall not make the product unavailable to a consumer
for an extended period of time.
(3) Strong passwords.
(A) If the product uses passwords for remote authentication, it shall
require that strong passwords are used, including having password strength
requirements.
(B) Any nonunique default passwords shall be reset as part of the
device’s initial setup to protect the device from vulnerability to guessable
password attacks.
(4) Vulnerability management. The business shall have a system in
place to manage vulnerabilities in the product, which shall include a point of
contact for reporting vulnerabilities to ensure that vendors are actively
managing vulnerabilities throughout the product’s lifecycle.
VT LEG #386333 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.630
2026 Page 3 of 3
(5) Privacy practices.
(A) The product shall have a privacy policy that is easily accessible,
written in language that is easily understood, and appropriate for the person
using the device or service.
(B) The business shall notify consumers about substantive changes to
the policy of the product.
(C) The business shall disclose if it collects, transmits, or shares data
collected by the product for marketing purposes and shall provide the right to
opt-out of such practices.
(D) The business shall permit consumers to delete their data and
account that are related to the product and shall adopt a policy setting standard
retention periods for consumer data.
(b) Enforcement. A business that violates this section commits an unfair
and deceptive act in commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386333 v.1